Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.380

Meetings.

Regular meetings of the board of directors of any school district shall be held monthly or more often at such a time as the board of directors by resolution shall determine or the bylaws of the board may prescribe. Special or deferred meetings may be held from time to time as circumstances may demand, at the call of the president, if a first-class district, or the chair of the board, if a second-class district, or on petition of a majority of the members of the board. All meetings shall be open to the public unless the board shall otherwise order an executive session as provided in RCW 42.30.110.

[ 1990 c 33 s 315; 1983 c 3 s 35; 1975 c 43 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.324. Prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 291 s 9; RRS s 4798; prior: 1897 c 118 s 86; 1890 p 389 s 13. Formerly RCW 28.62.090. (ii) 1965 ex.s. c 87 s 1; 1909 c 97 p 299 s 6; RRS s 4816. Formerly RCW 28.63.030. (iii) 1965 ex.s. c 87 s 2; 1909 c 97 p 302 s 6; RRS s 4828. Formerly RCW 28A.315.510, 28A.57.324, 28.63.032.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.